Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF787.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13D.02, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Conditions. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end A meeting governed by section 13D.01, subdivisions 1, 2, 4, and 5, and this section may be conducted by interactive technology so long as: (1) all members of the body participating in the meeting, wherever their physical location, can hear and see one another and can hear and see all discussion and testimony presented at any location at which at least one member is present; (2) members of the public present at the regular meeting location of the body can hear and see all discussion and testimony and all votes of members of the body; (3) at least one member of the body is physically present at the regular meeting location;new text begin andnew text end (4) all votes are conducted by roll call so each member's vote on each issue can be identified and recordeddeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (5) each location at which a member of the body is present is open and accessible to the public. deleted text end deleted text begin (b) A meeting satisfies the requirements of paragraph (a), although a member of the public body participates from a location that is not open or accessible to the public, if the member has not participated more than three times in a calendar year from a location that is not open or accessible to the public, and: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) the member is serving in the military and is at a required drill, deployed, or on active duty; or deleted text end deleted text begin (2) the member has been advised by a health care professional against being in a public place for personal or family medical reasons. deleted text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13D.02, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Notice of regular and all member locations. If interactive technology is used to conduct a regular, special, or emergency meeting, the public body shall provide notice of the regular meeting location and deleted text begin notice of any location where a member of the public body willdeleted text end new text begin notice that some members maynew text end be participating in the meeting by interactive technologydeleted text begin , except for the locations of members participating pursuant to subdivision 1, paragraph (b)deleted text end . The timing and method of providing notice must be as described in section 13D.04.